District of Columbia statutes.
7-705.03

Court costs and attorney’s fees.

The court shall award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to a resident who prevails in an action brought under § 7-705.01 or § 7-705.02.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 503, 36 DCR 534
1981 Ed., § 6-3543.